en: Dried meals, Dehydrated meals, Dried prepared dishes, Dehydrated prepared dishes
de: Getrocknete Fertiggerichte
es: Comidas preparadas deshidratadas, Platos preparados deshidratados
fi: kuivatut ateriat
fr: Plats préparés déshydratés, Plats cuisinés déshydratés
he: מנות מיובשות
hr: Sušena jela
it: Piatti pronti disidratati
lt: Džiovinti patiekalai, dehidratuoti patiekalai, džiovinti paruošti patiekalai
nl: Kant-en-klaarmaaltijden (gedroogd)
pl: Dania gotowe suszone, Dania gotowe w proszku
pt: Refeições desidratadas
ro: Mese uscate, Mese preparate uscate

en: Refrigerated meals, Refrigerated prepared meals, Refrigerated prepared dishes
bg: Охладени ястия
ca: Menjars refrigerats, Plats preparats refrigerats
de: Gekühlte Gerichte
es: Comidas preparadas refrigeradas, Platos preparados refrigerados
fi: jäähdytetyt ateriat
fr: Plats préparés réfrigérés, Plats cuisinés réfrigérés
hr: Rashlađena jela
hu: Hűtött húsok
it: Piatti pronti refrigerati
lt: Šaldyti patiekalai, Šaldyti paruošti patiekalai
nl: Kant-en-klaarmaaltijden (diepvries)
pt: Refeições refrigeradas
ru: Замороженные обеды

en: Canned meats
bg: Месо в консерва
de: Dosenfleisch
es: Carnes enlatadas
fi: purkitetut lihat
fr: Viandes en conserve
hr: Mesne konzerve
it: Carne in scatola
ja: 肉の缶詰
lt: Mėsos konservai, Konservuotos mėsos
nl: Vlees in blik/pot, Conservenvlees
pl: Konserwy mięsne, Konserwa mięsna
pt: Carnes enlatadas
ro: Conserve carne, Conserve de carne
ru: Консервированное мясо
tr: Konserve et
zh: 罐装肉, 肉罐头

en: Canned game
fr: Viandes de gibier en conserve

en: Canned sheep meat
fr: Viande de mouton en conserve

en: Canned veal meat
fr: Viande de veau en conserve

en: Canned poultries, Canned poultry
fr: Volailles en conserve, volaille en conserve

en: Spanish omelettes, Spanish-style tortilla with onions, Omelette with potatoes and onions
de: Kartoffel Tortillas
es: Tortillas de patata
fi: espanjalaiset tortillat
fr: Omelettes de pommes de terre, Omelettes espagnoles, Tortilla espagnole aux oignons, Omelette aux pommes de terre et oignons
hr: Španjolski omleti
ja: トルティージャ・デ・パタタス, トルティージャ, トルティーリャ, トルティーヤ, スペイン風オムレツ
lt: Ispaniški omletai, ispaniško stiliaus tortilija su svogūnais, omletas su bulvėmis ir svogūnais
nl: Spaanse tortillas
pl: Hiszpańska tortilla
pt: Tortilhas de batata

en: Egg-free spanish omelettes
de: Eierfreie Kartoffel Tortillas
es: Tortillas de patata sin huevo
fr: Omelettes espagnoles sans oeuf
hr: Španjolski omlet bez jaja
nl: Spaanse tortillas zonder ei

en: Filled steamed buns
nl: Bapao, Gevulde gestoomde broodjes

en: Crepe filled with cheese
de: Käsepfannkuchen, Käse Pfannkuchen, Pfannkuchen mit Käse
fr: Crêpes au fromage, Crêpes garnies au fromage, Crêpes garnie au fromage, Crêpe au fromage, Crêpes fourrées au fromage, Crêpe fourrée au fromage, Galettes au fromage
hr: Palačinka punjena sirom

en: Crepe filled with cheese and bechamel sauce, buckwheat crepe filled with cheese and bechamel sauce
fr: Crêpe fourrée béchamel fromage, Galette fourrée béchamel fromage
hr: Palačinke punjene sirom i bešamel umakom
nl: Boekweitpannenkoeken gevuld met kaas en bechamel

en: Ham and mushroom pancake in cheese sauce
fr: Ficelle picarde
hr: Palačinka od šunke i gljiva u umaku od sira
nl: Ham-kaas pannenkoeken in kaassaus

en: Filled buckwheat crepes
fr: Galettes fourrées, Galettes de blé noir fourrées
hr: Punjene palačinke od heljde
nl: Gevulde boekweitpannenkoeken

en: Sugary filled buckwheat crepes
fr: Galettes fourrées sucrées, Galettes de blé noir fourrées sucrées
hr: Palačinke od heljde punjene šećerom
nl: Zoete gevulde boekweitpannenkoeken

en: Salty filled buckwheat crepes
fr: Galettes fourrées salées, Galettes de blé noir fourrées salées
hr: Slane punjene palačinke od heljde
nl: hartige gevulde boekweitpannenkoeken

en: Crepe filled with ham
fr: Galettes au jambon, Galettes fourrée béchamel jambon

en: buckwheat crepe with cheese and ham, buckwheat crepe with ham and cheese, Crepe filled with cheese ham and bechamel sauce, buckwheat crepe filled with cheese ham and bechamel sauce
fr: Galettes jambon fromage, Galette fourrée béchamel jambon fromage
hr: Palačinka od heljde sa sirom i šunkom
nl: Boekweitpannenkoeken gevuld met ham en kaas

fr: Galettes au chèvre et aux lardons
nl: Boekweitpannenkoeken met geitenkaas en spekjes

en: Buckwheat crepe with mushrooms, Buckwheat crepe filled with mushrooms, Buckwheat crepe filled with mushrooms and bechamel sauce, Crepe filled with mushrooms, Crepe filled with mushrooms and bechamel sauce
fr: Galettes aux champignons, Crêpes aux champignons, Galettes fourrées aux champignons, Galette fourrée à la béchamel et aux champignons, Crêpe fourrée à la béchamel et aux champignons